Tennessee, session 114, HB1771.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 41, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "education assessment" means an assessment,
evaluation, or survey administered to an inmate in the custody or under the supervision
of the department of correction that is designed to collect information regarding the
highest grade or educational level attained by the inmate, as well as to determine the
inmate's interest in continuing, completing, or advancing their education.
(b) The department shall conduct an education assessment:
(1) During the intake of each inmate sentenced to serve a period of
confinement for committing a felony offense and at least annually thereafter; and
(2) At least annually for each inmate who, on or after July 1, 2026, is
serving a period of confinement for committing a felony offense.
(c) The department shall notify each inmate who is serving a period of
confinement for committing a felony offense and who is eligible to continue, complete, or
advance their education of the educational programming and opportunities available to
the inmate. The notice required in this subsection (c) must be provided in writing no
later than ninety (90) days from the date of the education assessment.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1771
009340
- 1 -